Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Capital Plaza Authority

58.210.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

58.215.
Capital Plaza Authority — Powers — Members — Appointment — Compensation — Officers — Records. [Repealed.]

58.220.
Powers of authority. [Repealed.]

58.225.
Agreements for financing or construction of projects. [Repealed.]

58.230.
Leases by authority — Terms. [Repealed.]

58.235.
Revenue bonds, issuance — Contents. [Repealed.]

58.240.
Bonds not obligations of state — How paid. [Repealed.]

58.245.
Security for bonds, forms — Terms of trust indenture. [Repealed.]

58.250.
Bondholders may enforce rights. [Repealed.]

58.255.
Bonds of authority, legal investments. [Repealed.]

58.260.
Refunding bonds. [Repealed.]

58.265.
Funds received as trust funds. [Repealed.]

58.270.
Authority tax-exempt. [Repealed.]

58.275.
Acquisition of property — Condemnation. [Repealed.]

58.280.
Operation and maintenance of project by lessee. [Repealed.]

58.285.
Local governments may convey or lease to authority, procedure. [Repealed.]

58.290.
Conveyance to lessee, when. [Repealed.]

58.295.
Compensation for damage to private property. [Repealed.]

58.300.
Engineering and other studies authorized — Expense, how paid. [Repealed.]

58.305.
Annual report of authority — Audit. [Repealed.]

58.310.
Officer or employee not to purchase bonds, penalty. [Repealed.]

58.315.
Act supplemental to other powers. [Repealed.]